Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB298.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.506 is amended to read as follows:
All natural gas, authorized and required to be transported pursuant to KRS 278.505 shall:
(1) Be of the same quality and meet the same specifications as that natural gas being
purchased by the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company as contained in
the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission tariff applicable to the intrastate
pipeline or local distribution company's natural gas supplier;
(2) Be delivered to the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company by the person
for whom the natural gas is to be transported at a point in the system technically
capable of receiving gas at the proposed delivery rate and proper pressure;
(3) Be transported pursuant to a written contract between the parties setting forth
specific arrangements as to volumes to be transported, points of delivery, method of
metering, timing of receipts and deliveries of gas and other matters relating to
individual customer circumstances;
(4) Not be transported if the performance of this service would detrimentally affect the
ability of the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company to supply regular gas
service to its customers; and
(5) Be subject to curtailment and interruption when in the judgment of the intrastate
pipeline or local distribution company, said curtailment or interruption is necessary
to enable the maintenance of deliveries to residential and other high priority
customers or to respond to an emergency.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/27/2026 9:20 AM Jacketed